src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON 	Nf4-10

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-OCHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-OCHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-OCHA;

LEXICON 	Nf4-11

Nf4-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Ath		PL-TÍ;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath	PL-TÍ;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Ath		PL-TÍ;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : Leathnú  +acha

!! an bheoir -> na beoracha (beers)

LEXICON 	Nf5-1

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D5-1;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Lea		PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Lea	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Lea		PL-(E)ACHA;


!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Gen Sg : Coim + ach
!! Strong Plurals : Coimriú +eacha

!! an chathaoir -> na cathaoireacha (chairs) (Note long vowel aoi is not sync.
!! an cathair -> na cathracha

LEXICON 		Nf5-2

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D5-2;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(E)ACHA;

!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Gen Sg : Coim + a
!! Strong Plurals : Coimriú +(e)acha
!! samhail -> samhla
!! anacair -> anacra
LEXICON 		Nf5-2a

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D5-2a;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(E)ACHA;
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Gen Sg : Coim + Slen + e
!! Strong Plurals : Coimriú +(e)acha
!! crithir - critre
!! fothair - foithre
LEXICON 		Nf5-2b

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D5-2b;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(E)ACHA;
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON 		Nf5-3
+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D5-3;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C		PL-NA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-NA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V		PL-NA;

LEXICON 		Nf5-4

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D5-5;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(CAOL)EACHA;

!! tarraingt - tarraingthe - tarraingtí
LEXICON 		Nf5-7		! 11/04/08

+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G	Gen-sg-D5-7;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V	Voc-sg-0;

+Noun+Fem+Com:^C^Coim		PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-Í;
+Noun+Fem+Voc:^V^Coim		PL-Í;


!************************************************************************** 
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------    
!! MASCULINE NOUN continuation classes
!--------------------------------------------------------------------------    



LEXICON Nm1-SINGULAR
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D1;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-1;


!! WEAK PLURALS (i.e. where the nominative and genitive plurals are different) 
!
!! TYPE 1 Nom pl. ends in conson. eg cat : cait, fear : fir, marcach: marcaigh 

LEXICON Nm1-1

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C		PL-CAOLÚ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-TADA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;


!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! TYPE 2 Nom pl. formed by adding -a eg cos : cosa, úll : úlla 

LEXICON Nm1-2 

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-TADA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! (TYPE 3) Nom pl. formed by adding -ta eg 

LEXICON Nm1-3 

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-TA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-TA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-TA;

LEXICON Nm1-4

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(LEA)THA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(LEA)THA;

LEXICON Nm1-5

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-ATHRÚ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-ATHRÚ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-ATHRÚ;

LEXICON Nm1-6

Nm1-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(E)ANNA;

LEXICON Nm1-7

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Caol			PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Caol	PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Caol			PL-Í;


LEXICON Nm1-8

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(E)ANNA;

LEXICON Nm1-9

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(CAOL)E;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(CAOL)E;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(CAOL)E;

LEXICON Nm1-10

Nm1-SINGULAR; 
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Coim			PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Coim	PL-(CAOL)EACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Coim			PL-(CAOL)EACHA;

LEXICON Nm1-11
Nm1-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(E)ACHA;
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! 2nd Declension
!! sliabh -> na sléibhte 

LEXICON Nm2-SINGULAR
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D2;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm2-1

Nm2-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Caol			PL-TE;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Caol	PL-TE;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Caol			PL-TE;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON Nm3-SINGULAR

+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G	Gen-sg-D3;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

LEXICON Nm3a-SINGULAR
+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C	Nom-sg; 
+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G^Ath	Gen-sg-D3;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V	Voc-sg-0;

!! 3rd Declension
!! Strong Plurals : +í 
!!     as in Nm7 but singular are different

!! eg. bádóir -> na bádóirí

LEXICON Nm3-1 

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-Í;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-Í;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : +anna

!! eg. an bláth -> na bláthanna

LEXICON Nm3-2 

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(E)ANNA;
!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : +aí

LEXICON Nm3-3

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-AÍ;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! gen briocht -> breachta
!! Strong Plurals : +aí
!! briocht -> briochtaí
LEXICON Nm3-3a

Nm3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G		PL-AÍ;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-AÍ;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : +anna
!! eg. an bláth -> na bláthanna

LEXICON Nm3-4a

!! ^Lea,broadening, is required, in gen sg: io -> ea (bior, crios) 
!! and this is done using ^Ath (change)
!! pl bior -> bioranna
Nm3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(E)ANNA;

!---------------------------------------------------------------------------
!! Strong Plurals : Athrú +anna (io->ea)
!! eg. an cith -> na ceathanna
LEXICON Nm3-4

Nm3a-SINGULAR;
!! ^Lea,broadening, is required, in gen sg: cith -> ceatha, greim -> greama
!! and this is done using ^Ath (change)
!! pl also broadened cith -> ceathanna
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C^Ath^Lea		PL-(E)ANNA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G^Ath^Lea	PL-(E)ANNA;	
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V^Ath^Lea		PL-(E)ANNA;		

LEXICON Nm3-5

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(E)ACHA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(E)ACHA;

LEXICON Nm3-6

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-(LEA)A;

LEXICON Nm3-7

Nm3-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C			PL-TA;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Strong:^G	PL-TA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V			PL-TA;

LEXICON Nm3-8

Nm3a-SINGULAR;
+Noun+Masc+Com:^C		PL-(LEA)A;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak:^G	PL-TADA;
+Noun+Masc+Voc:^V		PL-(LEA)A;
